Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1642
Terminated employee; election to continue coverage; procedure.

If the terminated employee elects to continue such coverage, the election form and the first monthly premium shall be sent by certified mail with return receipt requested to the insurance company or health maintenance organization within ten days after the date of receipt of the notice. Premiums for each subsequent month shall be paid by the terminated employee without further notice to the insurance company or health maintenance organization.

Laws 1989, LB 318, § 3.